trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/tomerge-apertium-swe-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="sed/del__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~del / ~len / ~ler / ~lerne -->
  <e>       <p><l>del</l>       <r>del<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>del<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>del<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerne</l>     <r>del<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="trus/sel__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~del / ~len / ~ler / ~lerne -->
  <e>       <p><l>sel</l>       <r>sel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>sel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>sel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerne</l>     <r>sel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="øl__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sp"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~len / ~ | (~ler) / ~lene | (~lerne) -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ler</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lerne</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="m/or__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~or / ~oren / ~ødre / ~ødrene -->
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oren</l>      <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ødre</l>      <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ødrene</l>    <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ton__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~net | (~nen) / ~ | (~s) / ~nene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>nen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ank/er__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~er / ~eret | (~ret / ~re / ~rene -->
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eret</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ret</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="m/oder__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~oder / ~oderen / ~ødre / ~ødrene -->
  <e>       <p><l>oder</l>      <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oderen</l>    <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ødre</l>      <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ødrene</l>    <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="æble__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~t / ~r / ~rne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rne</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="verb/um__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~um / ~et / ~er / ~erne -->
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fakt/um__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ummet</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aerne</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="øj/e__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~e / ~et / ~ne / ~nene -->
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nene</l>      <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="synops/is__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~e | (~is) / ~en / ~er / ~erne -->
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>is</l>        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>      <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="salut__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~ten / ~ter / ~terne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ten</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ter</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>terne</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="anker">           <i>ank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="faktum">          <i>fakt</i><par n="fakt/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="laboratorium">    <i>laboratori</i><par n="verb/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="moder">           <i>m</i><par n="m/oder__n"/></e>
<e lm="rige">            <i>rige</i><par n="æble__n"/></e>
<e lm="substitut">       <i>substitut</i><par n="salut__n"/></e>
<e lm="sanatorium">      <i>sanatori</i><par n="verb/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="seddel">          <i>sed</i><par n="sed/del__n"/></e>
<e lm="trussel">         <i>trus</i><par n="trus/sel__n"/></e>
<e lm="studium">         <i>studi</i><par n="verb/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="verbum">          <i>verb</i><par n="verb/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="polynomium">      <i>polynomi</i><par n="verb/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="participium">     <i>participi</i><par n="verb/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="æble">            <i>æble</i><par n="æble__n"/></e>
<e lm="ønske">           <i>ønske</i><par n="æble__n"/></e>
<e lm="øje">             <i>øj</i><par n="øj/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="øl" c="en øl">    <i>øl</i><par n="øl__n"/></e>
<e lm="bedstemor" a="PT">              <i>bedstem</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="skålanker" c="domain:sjöochhav" a="PT">              <i>skålank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="kloanker" c="domain:sjöochhav" a="PT">              <i>kloank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="letvægtsanker" c="domain:sjöochhav" a="PT">              <i>letvægtsank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="pladeanker" c="domain:sjöochhav" a="PT">              <i>pladeank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="plovanker" c="domain:sjöochhav" a="PT">              <i>plovank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="sandanker" c="domain:sjöochhav" a="PT">              <i>sandank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="stokanker" c="domain:sjöochhav" a="PT">              <i>stokank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="arbejde">         <i>arbejde</i><par n="æble__n"/></e>
<e lm="bajonet">         <i>bajonet</i><par n="salut__n"/></e>
<e lm="ballet">          <i>ballet</i><par n="salut__n"/></e>
<e lm="billede">         <i>billede</i><par n="æble__n"/></e>
<e lm="billet">          <i>billet</i><par n="salut__n"/></e>
<e lm="bror">            <i>br</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="broder">          <i>br</i><par n="m/oder__n"/></e>
<e lm="debat">           <i>debat</i><par n="salut__n"/></e>
<e lm="dige">            <i>dige</i><par n="æble__n"/></e>
<e lm="dynamit">         <i>dynamit</i><par n="salut__n"/></e>
<e lm="farbror">         <i>farbr</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="favorit">         <i>favorit</i><par n="salut__n"/></e>
<e lm="frimærke">        <i>frimærke</i><par n="æble__n"/></e>
<e lm="granit">          <i>granit</i><par n="salut__n"/></e>
<e lm="grundemne">       <i>grundemne</i><par n="æble__n"/></e>
<e lm="halstørklæde">    <i>halstørklæde</i><par n="æble__n"/></e>
<e lm="hjerte">          <i>hjerte</i><par n="æble__n"/></e>
<e lm="idræt">           <i>idræt</i><par n="salut__n"/></e>
<e lm="jordemor">        <i>jordem</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="klarinet">        <i>klarinet</i><par n="salut__n"/></e>
<e lm="klædningsstykke"> <i>klædningsstykke</i><par n="æble__n"/></e>
<e lm="lut">             <i>lut</i><par n="salut__n"/></e>
<e lm="mor">             <i>m</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="museum">          <i>muse</i><par n="verb/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="mønster">         <i>mønst</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="kloster">         <i>klost</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="område">          <i>område</i><par n="æble__n"/></e>
<e lm="plet">            <i>plet</i><par n="salut__n"/></e>
<e lm="raket">           <i>raket</i><par n="salut__n"/></e>
<e lm="rygte">           <i>rygte</i><par n="æble__n"/></e>
<e lm="samleje">         <i>samleje</i><par n="æble__n"/></e>
<e lm="split">           <i>split</i><par n="salut__n"/></e>
<e lm="styre">           <i>styre</i><par n="æble__n"/></e>
<e lm="teater">          <i>teat</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="tingsret">        <i>tingsret</i><par n="salut__n"/></e>
<e lm="ton">             <i>ton</i><par n="ton__n"/></e>
<e lm="vidne">           <i>vidne</i><par n="æble__n"/></e>
